Indiana, session 2026, HB1097.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-38-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.48-2005,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "chronic disease"
means one (1) of the following conditions:
(1) Asthma.
(2) Diabetes.
(3) Congestive heart failure or coronary heart disease.
(4) Hypertension.
(5) Kidney disease.
(6) Parkinson's disease.
(6) (7) A condition that the state department:
(A) determines should be included on the registry; and
(B) chooses to add to the registry by rule under IC 4-22-2.
2026 IN 1097—LS 6356/DI 147